Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 9. Limited Liability Partnerships.

Sec. 32.06.911.
Change to limited liability partnership; statement of qualification.

A partnership may become a limited liability partnership under this section.

The terms and conditions on which a partnership becomes a limited liability partnership must be approved by the vote necessary to amend the partnership agreement except, in the case of a partnership agreement that expressly considers obligations to contribute to the partnership, by the vote necessary to amend those contribution provisions.

After the approval required by (b) of this section, a partnership may become a limited liability partnership by filing a statement of qualification. The statement must contain

the name of the partnership;

the street address of the partnership’s chief executive office and, if different, the street address of an office in this state, if any;

if the partnership does not have an office in this state, the name and street address of the partnership’s agent for service of process;

a statement that the partnership elects to be a limited liability partnership; and

a deferred effective date, if any.

The agent of a limited liability partnership for service of process must be an individual who is a resident of this state or a person authorized to do business in this state.

The status of a partnership as a limited liability partnership is effective on the later of the filing of the statement or a date specified in the statement. The status remains effective, regardless of changes in the partnership, until it is cancelled under AS

32.06.970(d)

or revoked under AS

32.06.913

.

The status of a partnership as a limited liability partnership and the liability of its partners are not affected by errors or later changes in the information required to be contained in the statement of qualification under (c) of this section.

The filing of a statement of qualification establishes that a partnership has satisfied all conditions precedent to the qualification of the partnership as a limited liability partnership.

An amendment or cancellation of a statement of qualification is effective when it is filed or on a deferred effective date specified in the amendment or cancellation.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Sec. 32.06.912.
Name.

The name of a limited liability partnership must end with “Registered Limited Liability Partnership,” “Limited Liability Partnership,” “R.L.L.P.,” “L.L.P.,” “RLLP,” or “LLP.”

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Sec. 32.06.913.
Biennial report; revocation of qualification.

A limited liability partnership, and a foreign limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this state, shall file with the department a biennial report that contains

the name of the limited liability partnership and the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws the foreign limited liability partnership is formed;

the street address of the partnership’s chief executive office and, if different, the street address of an office of the partnership in this state, if any; and

if the partnership does not have an office in this state, the name and street address of the partnership’s current agent for service of process.

A biennial report is due before January 2 of the filing year. A partnership filing a statement of qualification or a foreign partnership becoming authorized to transact business in this state during an even-numbered year shall file the biennial report each even-numbered year. A partnership filing a statement of qualification or a foreign partnership becoming authorized to transact business in this state during an odd-numbered year shall file the biennial report each odd-numbered year. The biennial report is delinquent if not filed before February 1 of each odd or even-numbered year as provided in this subsection.

The department may revoke the statement of qualification of a partnership that fails to file a biennial report when due or pay the required filing fee. To revoke, the department shall provide the partnership at least 60 days’ written notice of intent to revoke the statement. The notice must be mailed to the partnership at its chief executive office stated in the last filed statement of qualification or biennial report. The notice must specify the biennial report that has not been filed or the fee that has not been paid, and the effective date of the revocation. The revocation is not effective if the biennial report is filed and the fee is paid before the effective date of the revocation.

A revocation under (c) of this section only affects a partnership’s status as a limited liability partnership and is not an event of dissolution of the partnership.

A partnership whose statement of qualification has been revoked may apply to the department for reinstatement within two years after the effective date of the revocation. The application must state

the name of the partnership and the effective date of the revocation; and

that the ground for revocation either did not exist or has been corrected.

A reinstatement under (e) of this section relates back to and takes effect on the effective date of the revocation, and the partnership’s status as a limited liability partnership continues as if the revocation had never occurred.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Sec. 32.06.921.
Law governing foreign limited liability partnerships.

The law under which a foreign limited liability partnership is formed governs relations between and among the partners and between the partners and the partnership and the liability of partners for obligations of the partnership.

A foreign limited liability partnership may not be denied a statement of foreign qualification by reason of any difference between the law under which the partnership was formed and the law of this state.

A statement of foreign qualification does not authorize a foreign limited liability partnership to engage in a business or exercise a power that a partnership may not engage in or exercise in this state as a limited liability partnership.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Sec. 32.06.922.
Statement of foreign qualification.

Before transacting business in this state, a foreign limited liability partnership must file a statement of foreign qualification. The statement must contain

the name of the foreign limited liability partnership that satisfies the requirements of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is formed and ends with “Registered Limited Liability Partnership,” “Limited Liability Partnership,” “R.L.L.P.,” “L.L.P.,” “RLLP,” or “LLP”;

the street address of the partnership’s chief executive office and, if different, the street address of an office of the partnership in this state, if any;

if there is not an office of the partnership in this state, the name and street address of the partnership’s agent for service of process; and

a deferred effective date, if any.

The agent of a foreign limited liability company for service of process must be an individual who is a resident of this state or a person authorized to do business in this state.

The status of a partnership as a foreign limited liability partnership is effective on the later of the filing of the statement of foreign qualification or a date specified in the statement. The status remains effective, regardless of changes in the partnership, until it is cancelled under AS

32.06.970(d)

or revoked under AS

32.06.913

.

An amendment or cancellation of a statement of foreign qualification is effective when it is filed or on a deferred effective date specified in the amendment or cancellation.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Sec. 32.06.923.
Effect of failure to have statement of foreign qualification.

A foreign limited liability partnership transacting business in this state may not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it has in effect a statement of foreign qualification.

The failure of a foreign limited liability partnership to have in effect a statement of foreign qualification does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign limited liability partnership or preclude it from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

A limitation on personal liability of a partner is not waived solely by transacting business in this state without a statement of foreign qualification.

If a foreign limited liability partnership transacts business in this state without a statement of foreign qualification, the commissioner is its agent for service of process with respect to a right of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Sec. 32.06.924.
Activities not constituting transacting business.

Activities of a foreign limited liability partnership that do not constitute transacting business under AS

32.06.921

—

32.06.925

include

maintaining, defending, or settling an action or proceeding;

holding meetings of its partners or carrying on another activity concerning its internal affairs;

maintaining bank accounts;

maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the partnership’s own securities or maintaining trustees or depositories for those securities;

selling through independent contractors;

soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or by another method, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

creating or acquiring indebtedness, with or without a mortgage, or other security interest in property;

collecting debts or foreclosing mortgages or other security interests in property securing the debts, and holding, protecting, and maintaining property so acquired;

conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within 30 days and is not one transaction in the course of similar transactions; and

transacting business in interstate commerce.

In AS

32.06.921

—

32.06.925

, the ownership in this state of income-producing real property or tangible personal property, other than property excluded under (a) of this section, constitutes transacting business in this state.

This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign limited liability partnership to service of process, taxation, or regulation under another law of this state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)

Sec. 32.06.925.
Action by attorney general.

The attorney general may maintain an action to restrain a foreign limited liability partnership from transacting business in this state in violation of AS

32.06.921

—

32.06.925

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2000)